Utah statutes.
70C-7-205.   Statute of limitations.

No action under this title may be brought more than one year after the date of the occurrence of the violation.  This section does not bar a person from asserting a violation of this title in an action to collect the debt which is brought more than one year after the date of the occurrence of the violation as a matter of defense by recoupment or setoff to the extent of the outstanding balance of the debt.



Enacted by Chapter 159, 1985 General Session

